Hawaii statutes.
[§90D-4]
Officers. (a) The officers of
the commission shall be the chair and vice chair. All officers shall be
elected by the voting commission members from among their ranks and shall serve
for a term of one year. Vacancies in any offices shall be filled with an
election by the commission for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(b) The
chair shall:

(1) Preside at
all meetings of the commission;

(2) Appoint all
committee chairs;

(3) Assist all
chairs in the planning of committee activities;

(4) Supervise all
chairs as to the management of committee plans;

(5) Authorize and
execute the wishes of the commission; and

(6) Be an ex
officio member of all committees.

(c) The
vice chair shall assist the chair, and, in the absence of the chair, perform
the duties of the chair. The vice chair shall accept special assignments from
the chair and perform other duties as delegated by the commission. [L 2002, c
88, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next